Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
General Provisions
§ 81-5-100.
Establishment of electronic banking terminals.

For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the meaning herein described unless the context shall otherwise require:

“Electronic terminal” means an unmanned electronic device owned or operated by a federally insured bank or thrift through which a consumer may initiate an electronic fund transfer.

“Electronic fund transfer” means any of the following:

The withdrawal of cash from or the deposit of cash or checks into an unmanned electronic device, such as an automatic teller machine, but not including night depositories;

An application for or acceptance of a loan through use of an unmanned electronic device;

The transfer of funds between accounts through use of an unmanned electronic device; or

The issuance of a check by an unmanned electronic device.

“Electronic fund transfer” does not mean access to accounts, the application for or acceptance of a loan, the transfer of funds between accounts or other banking services accomplished through the use of a personal computer or telephone.

A state bank or thrift, with the approval of the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance, may establish electronic terminals.

A bank desiring to establish such an electronic terminal shall file with the commissioner a written application requesting authority to establish such a terminal. Upon receipt of such application, the commissioner shall make inquiry into the facts sufficient to enable him to determine whether or not the proposed electronic terminal will provide bank customers with convenient access to the electronic transfer of funds. If the commissioner’s finding is favorable to the application, he shall grant the applicant a written permit to establish the terminal. These rights are extended to national banks upon the approval of the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States of America.

For the use of its electronic terminals connected to sharing networks or systems, a bank may impose a fee if imposition of the fee is disclosed at a time and in a manner that allows a user to terminate or cancel the transaction without incurring the transaction fee. Such fee shall not exceed Two Dollars ($2.00) or four percent (4%) of the gross amount of the transaction, whichever is greater. An agreement to share electronic terminals shall not prohibit, limit or restrict the right of a bank to charge such fees for the use of its electronic terminals as allowed by state or federal law, or require a bank to limit or waive its rights or obligations under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 338, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 438, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 45, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1996).

§ 81-5-101.
Dissolution of solvent banks.

When the owners of two-thirds of the capital stock of any solvent corporation engaged in a banking business shall have determined and voted to dissolve the corporation, they shall proceed in the following manner, to-wit:

The corporation shall advise the department of bank supervision by registered mail, over the signature of the board of directors of said corporation, of their intention to liquidate, accompanied by a certified copy of the minutes of the stockholders meeting authorizing the liquidation, and shall cause notice to be published once each week for three consecutive weeks in some newspaper published within the county in which the corporation is domiciled, giving the date of the proposed liquidation, and calling on all creditors and depositors to present for payment their claims against such corporation not later than sixty days after said date of liquidation. With said notice to the department of bank supervision the corporation shall file a detailed statement of its assets and liabilities.

The stockholders of the corporation shall, by and with the approval of the state comptroller appoint a special agent who shall have charge of said liquidation and shall be responsible to the creditors and stockholders of such corporation and to the department of bank supervision for the proper liquidation of the affairs of the corporation. The special agent shall furnish bond to be approved by the state comptroller for the faithful performance of his duties as special agent and shall receive as salary not more than $200.00 per month out of the assets of the liquidating bank while actively engaged in the liquidation of the affairs of the bank and shall be at all times under the supervision of the department of bank supervision. The certificate of appointment of the special agent shall be filed in the office of the department of bank supervision, and a certified copy filed in the office of the chancery clerk of the county in which the bank is domiciled.

Upon the date set for the liquidation of the bank as per published notice the special agent shall take charge and file with the department of bank supervision a sworn detailed statement of the assets and liabilities of the bank as shown by the books of the same, a certified copy to be filed in the office of the chancery clerk of said county. He shall proceed to pay in full as presented all claims of creditors and depositors and shown by the books of the bank and all claims which may be proven against the bank.

A sufficient bond to be approved by the state comptroller in such amount as he may require shall be furnished by the stockholders of the bank made and conditioned to insure the payment of all liabilities as shown by the books of the bank and all proven claims against the bank. The said bond shall be filed in the office of the department of bank supervision. Suit may be brought upon this bond by any creditor claimant, and such suit shall be filed in the chancery court of the county in which the corporation is domiciled. No suit may be brought upon such bond except within four months after date of liquidation as provided in paragraph (a) of this section. When any such suit shall be brought on said bond, notice shall be given by publication in a newspaper published in the county of the domicile of the bank, requiring all creditors and claimants to intervene in order to determine in one proceeding all claims of creditors.

At the expiration of sixty days from the date of the liquidation as provided in paragraph (a) of this section, the special agent shall file with the department of bank supervision a detailed report of all his proceedings, collections and disbursements and list of all assets remaining and of all liabilities still unpaid or unclaimed, a certified copy of which shall be filed in the office of the chancery clerk of the county. A list of all unclaimed deposits or creditors as shown by the books together with the amounts due them, shall be delivered in cash, to the department of bank supervision to be deposited by the state comptroller in some bank subject to their order for payment upon presentation of claims by said depositors or creditors. The remaining assets of the bank may be distributed among the stockholders, provided the stockholders shall make sufficient bond approved by the state comptroller in amounts of the capital, surplus and undivided profits of the banks, payable to the State of Mississippi, said bond to expire four months from the date of liquidation as provided in paragraph (a) of this section, if no claim or suit has been filed against such bond. At the expiration of this bond the state comptroller shall give notice by publication for three consecutive weeks in some local or county newspaper of the expiration of said bond, and the said bond shall be relieved from further liability, and the stockholders of the corporation shall be relieved from further liability as stockholders of such corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5225; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-103.
General penalty.

Any banker, officer, employee, director or agent of any state bank who shall knowingly or wilfully neglect to perform any duty required by law, where no other penalty is provided or who shall fail to conform to any lawful requirement made by the department of bank supervision shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $500.00 or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment. And each officer or employee of the department of bank supervision who shall wilfully fail to perform any duty required by law, where no other penalty is prescribed, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $500.00 or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5282; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-105.
Standard of care for bank directors established.

Bank and bank holding company officers and directors shall be deemed to stand in a fiduciary relationship to their bank or bank holding company and its stockholders and shall discharge the duties of their respective positions in good faith and with that diligence, care, judgment and skill as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Nothing contained in this section shall derogate from any indemnification authorized by either state or federal law.

A director or officer of a bank or bank holding company shall not be held personally liable to the corporation or its successor, or the shareholders thereof, for monetary damages unless the director or officer acted in a grossly negligent manner as defined in subsection (5) of this section or engaged in conduct which demonstrates a greater disregard of the duty of care than gross negligence, such as intentional tortious conduct or intentional breach of his duty of loyalty or intentional commission of corporate waste.

A director of a bank or bank holding company shall, in the performance of his duties, be fully protected in relying in good faith on the records of the bank or bank holding company and in relying in good faith upon information, opinions, reports or statements presented to him, to the bank or bank holding company, to the board of directors or to any committee thereof by any of the bank’s or bank holding company’s officers or employees or by any committee of the board of directors, or by any counsel, appraiser, engineer or independent or certified public accountant selected with reasonable care by the board of directors or any committee thereof or by any officer having the authority to make such selection or by any other person as to matters the director in good faith believes are within such selected person’s professional or expert competence, such person having been selected in good faith by the board of directors or any committee thereof or any officer having the authority to make such selection.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the provisions of this section are the sole and exclusive law governing the relation and liability of directors and officers to their bank or bank holding company, or their successor, or to the shareholders thereof, or to any other person or entity. The provisions of this section shall be retroactive.

As used in this section, the term “gross negligence” means a reckless disregard of, or a carelessness amounting to gross indifference to, the best interests of the bank or bank holding company or the shareholders thereof, and involves a substantial deviation below the standard of care expected to be maintained by a reasonably careful person under like circumstances.

The provisions of this section shall not affect the application of common law or any other statute relating to the duties of officers and directors of other corporate entities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 645, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).